Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2543.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-21-54 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-21 entitled "Retirement
of Municipal Employees" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-21-54. Reemployment of retired members.
Any retired member of the system is permitted to reenter the service of the system for not
more than seventy-five (75) ninety (90) working days or its equivalent of six hundred thirty (630)
working hours in a calendar year without interruption of pension benefits. Pension payments,
however, are suspended when that period is exceeded. This seventy-five-day (75) ninety-day (90)
rule shall not apply to police officers, as defined in § 28-9.2-3, for the purposes of their working
private details, paid for by a nongovernmental entity. If the retired member continues in service
beyond the seventy-five-day (75) ninety (90) working day period (with his or her annuity
temporarily suspended) the member is not eligible for pension credit for the additional service, nor
is the member required to make pension contributions for this service; provided, that any retired
member of the system is permitted to serve as an elected city or town council member or school
committee member and continues to be eligible for and receive the retirement allowance for service
other than that as a council member or school committee member.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004990
========